Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. In General
§ 35-7-123.
Establishment of food safety system.

The director of the department of agriculture shall establish and maintain a food safety program located within the department. The director shall carry out the provisions of the food safety program and shall be assisted by the director of the department of health. A local department of health, if established according to law, may establish and maintain its own local food safety program so long as the program meets the requirements of this act. The director of the department of agriculture or his designee shall:

Gather food safety information and disseminate the information to the public, food industry and to local departments of health with a food safety program;

On a voluntary basis, provide food safety training for the food industry in this state, work with other state, local and federal agencies to coordinate food safety educational efforts;

Regulate the safety of foods and work together with the department of health to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act, except that the director of the department of agriculture shall not promulgate any rules which impose standards or requirements related to meat processing which are more stringent than federal law, rules or regulations. In any area which does not have a local food safety program established pursuant to law, the department shall issue licenses, conduct inspections, hold hearings to enforce any legal provision or rule promulgated under this act;

Maintain a statewide database of food licenses and inspection results;

Work with federal, state and local agencies to coordinate food safety efforts and activities, and coordinate with all other agencies to maintain consistency in inspection and enforcement activities;

Establish food safety priorities for this state based on risk and information provided by the department of health;

Provide laboratory support for the analysis of routine food and water samples used to support inspection activities and to monitor safety;

Report each year to the department of health on how the food safety activities have addressed the epidemiological data provided by the department of health;

Assist the department of health, or any local jurisdiction, when requested to investigate possible food borne and water related illness;

Establish and maintain a meat inspection program for this state. However, nothing in this act shall be construed to grant authority in the director of the department of agriculture or his designee for the inspection or regulation of live animal production or the processing and storage of meat by a producer of live animals for nonprofit consumption.

The director of the department of health or his designee shall:

Carry out the surveillance of food borne illness with assistance from the department of agriculture and report each year to the department of agriculture and local jurisdictions on the leading causes of food borne illness;

Participate with the department of agriculture in a joint food safety rulemaking process;

Ensure the department of health is the lead agency for the investigation of possible food borne illness and outbreaks and to request assistance from the department of agriculture and local jurisdictions as determined to be necessary by the department of health;

Provide laboratory support for and conduct analysis of samples connected with disease outbreak investigations;

Provide support for local food safety programs as authorized by the legislature;

Take appropriate action against any person holding a food license for the purpose of protecting the public health and preventing the transmission of infectious disease;

Provide consultation and advice on food borne illness to local jurisdictions and to the department of agriculture as requested.

Duties of a local board of health shall include:

Issuing licenses, conducting inspections, holding hearings and taking enforcement actions as necessary to carry out the provisions of the food safety program;

Promulgating rules containing provisions for inspections which may differ from state food safety regulations promulgated under this act so long as direct food safety and disease transmission requirements including cooking temperatures, hot and cold holding temperatures, reheating times and temperatures, cooling times and temperatures, and such other requirements as determined by the department of agriculture, do not differ;

Coordinating activities with the department of agriculture in order to provide for statewide consistency;

Providing the department of agriculture with a quarterly report providing information on any food licenses issued and the results of any food inspections;

Reporting to the department of health any food borne outbreak of illness and assist the department of health in any outbreak investigations, if requested.

A local jurisdiction may provide laboratory support for food safety and drinking water inspection and accompanying monitoring activities.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 1; 2021 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning communicable diseases, see art. 1 to chapter 4 of this title.

For penalties for failure to properly dispose of dead animals, see §§

35-10-101

,

35-10-102

and

35-10-104

.

As to the state board of agriculture, see §

11-2-101

.

As to quarantine of diseased animals generally, see §

11-19-103

.

As to slaughter of diseased animals, see §§

11-19-104

to

11-19-106

.

As to storage of meat in cold storage lockers, see §

11-23-106

.

For prohibition against transportation of meat or poultry unlawfully obtained or killed, see §

11-30-107

.

For provisions relating to poultry, see §§

11-32-101

to

11-32-104

.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added “, except that the director of the department of agriculture shall not promulgate any rules which impose standards or requirements related to meat processing which are more stringent than federal law, rules or regulations” in the first sentence of (a)(iii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “and the governor's food safety council established pursuant to W.S.

35-7-127

” following “department of health” in the first sentence of (a)(iii); and deleted “and the governor's food safety council established pursuant to W.S.

35-7-127

” following “department of agriculture” in (b)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 5, provides that it is the intention of the Wyoming legislature to create a food safety system that is based on partnership between state and local agencies, the University of Wyoming, consumers and all levels of the food industry.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of packer, food store or restaurant for causing trichinosis, 96 ALR3d 451.

Construction and application of § 202 of Federal Packers and Stockyards Act (7 U.S.C. § 192) prohibiting certain trade practices by meat packers and live poultry dealers or handlers, 5 ALR Fed 729.

Validity, construction, and application of § 22 of Federal Meat Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. § 622) making it federal offense to bribe federal meat inspectors or for inspectors to accept bribe, 21 ALR Fed 977.

§ 35-7-124.
License required; exemptions; electronic transmittals.

Any person processing, distributing, storing or preparing any food for sale shall obtain a license from the department of agriculture or a local health department. The license is not transferable, shall be renewed on an annual basis and shall be prominently displayed in the establishment. No food establishment shall serve, hold for sale or sell food to the public without a valid license. An agricultural producer shall be exempt from the licensure requirement in this section for processing, distributing, storing or sale of any raw agricultural commodity he produces.

Written application for a new license shall be made on a form approved by the department of agriculture and provided by the department of agriculture or the local health department and shall be signed by the applicant. License requirements and fees for temporary food events operated by nonprofit organizations shall be waived. Licenses shall expire one (1) year after the date of issuance unless suspended or revoked. Licenses may be renewed each year upon application to the department or local health department. The director shall establish license categories and fees by rule and no fee shall exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), except that the following fees shall be as specified:

Food license . . . . . $200.00;

Food license annual renewal . . . . . $100.00;

Temporary food establishment license . . . . . $50.00.

Fifty percent (50%) of the fees collected pursuant to paragraphs (b)(i) through (iii) of this section shall be credited to the general fund. The remainder of any fees collected under this section shall be distributed as follows:

In any county, city or district without a local health department established pursuant to W.S.

35-1-301

et seq., the department of agriculture shall receive ninety percent (90%) of the amount of the fee collected and the department of health shall receive ten percent (10%). The revenues shall be deposited into a special account and shall be used to defer the cost associated with the food safety program;

In any county, city or district with a local health department established pursuant to W.S.

35-1-301

et seq., the local health department shall receive eighty-five percent (85%) of the amount of the fee collected, the department of agriculture shall receive ten percent (10%) and the department of health shall receive five percent (5%). The revenues shall be deposited into a special account and shall be used to defer the cost associated with the food safety program.

Before approving an application, the department of agriculture or the local health department shall determine that the establishment is in compliance with this act and any regulations promulgated hereunder.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to food operators or kitchens in private homes that prepare food that is not potentially hazardous and prepared for sale or use at farmers’ markets, roadside stands, private homes and at functions including, but not limited to those operated by not for profit charitable or religious organizations.

The director may allow the permitting, registration, licensing, testing, inspection and reporting requirements of this chapter to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

and any applicable federal electronic requirements.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to food prepared for, served, consumed, stored or sold at a traditional event or activity pursuant to W.S.

35-7-1703

. The definitions in W.S.

35-7-1702

shall apply to this subsection.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a producer selling food directly to the informed end consumer at a farmers market or through ranch, farm or home based sales pursuant to W.S.

11-49-103

. The definitions in W.S.

11-49-102

shall apply to this subsection.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to homemade beverages provided at an event held pursuant to W.S.

12-10-102

.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 1; 2005, ch. 175, § 2; 2009, ch. 77, § 1; 2011, ch. 153, § 2; 2015 ch. 121, § 2, effective March 3, 2015; 2016 ch. 86, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to licensing of veterinarians, see §§

33-30-203

to

33-30-214

.

As to an exemption from sales tax, see §

39-15-105

.

The 2005 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2005, ch. 175, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “sale” for “wholesale or retail use” in the first sentence of (a); in (b), deleted the former second and third sentences which read: “An initial license fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall accompany each application. The license fee for a temporary food event shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00) which event shall not exceed fourteen (14) days.”, deleted “accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00)” at the end of the fourth sentence, and substituted the last sentence for the former last sentence which read: “Any establishment which has a license on the effective date of this section shall pay a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for the following year and shall not be liable to pay the initial license fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00).”; and in (e), substituted “farmers’ markets, roadside stands, private homes and at functions including, but not limited to” for “functions, including” and deleted the former last sentence which defined “food that is not potentially hazardous.”

The 2011 amendment,

added (g).

Laws 2011, ch. 153, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2015 amendment,

added (h).

Laws 2015, ch. 121, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

added (j).

Laws 2016, ch. 86, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "except that the following fees shall be as specified" at the end of (b); added (b)(i) through (b)(iii) and made a related change; and added (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-110(a)(xxxi).

License and regulation required whenever sales are made to consumers. —

The purpose of former § 35-7-528 was to require a license from and regulation by the department of agriculture in every case where a producer sells dairy products directly to the public or to consumers. State ex rel. Kirk v. Gail, 373 P.2d 955,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1962).

Sale without license nuisance to be enjoined. —

Under former § 35-7-528, it was within the province of the trial court to determine whether the sale of milk by a farmer without a license constituted such a nuisance and so endangered the health of the public as to require the issuance of an injunction. State ex rel. Kirk v. Gail, 373 P.2d 955,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1962).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of proprietor of store, business, or place of amusement for injury to one using baby stroller, shopping cart, or the like furnished by defendant, 42 ALR5th 159.

Liability of owner or operator of business premises for injuries from electrically operated door, 44 ALR5th 525.

§ 35-7-125.
Summary suspension of a license.

A regulatory authority may summarily suspend a license to operate a food establishment if it determines through consultation with a health officer, inspection, examination of food, employees, records or other authorized means that an imminent health hazard exists including, but not limited to, fire, flood, extended interruption of electrical or water service, or sewage backup.

The regulatory authority may summarily suspend a person’s license by providing written notice of the summary suspension to the license holder or person in charge, without prior warning, notice of a hearing or a hearing.

The regulatory authority shall conduct an inspection of the establishment or food processing plant for which the license was summarily suspended within forty-eight (48) hours after receiving notice from the license holder stating that the conditions cited in the summary suspension order no longer exist.

A summary suspension shall remain in effect until the conditions cited in the notice of suspension no longer exist and the elimination of the conditions has been confirmed by the regulatory authority through inspection or other means as appropriate. A suspended license shall be reinstated immediately if the regulatory authority determines that the imminent health hazard no longer exists. A notice of reinstatement shall be provided to the license holder or person in charge of the establishment.

Temporary food events where no admission fee is charged and where no fee is charged for food shall not be subject to the license suspension provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to nuisances generally, see §§

6-6-201

to

6-6-209

.

§ 35-7-126.
License revocation.

The regulatory authority may initiate revocation proceedings for an establishment license:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 38, § 2.

For failure to correct conditions for which a summary suspension was issued;

For failure to correct critical violations from routine inspections;

For multiple critical violations on multiple occasions;

For a refusal to grant access pursuant to W.S.

35-7-121

.

The regulatory authority shall issue notice of a hearing to the license holder. The notice and the hearing shall be governed by the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

et seq.

Upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record, the regulatory authority shall issue an order which shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law.

The decision of the regulatory authority may be appealed to the district court pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

et seq.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 1; 2003, ch. 38, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

For judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 35-7-127.
Governor's food safety council. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 1; repealed by 2022 ch. 55, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.